Missouri, session 2026, HB4.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 4.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of
a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed
to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the stated
appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified
as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to
any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 4.005. To the Department of Revenue

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 2
For collecting highway related fees and taxes, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 4.005, 4.010, 4.015, 4.020, and 4.025, and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
4.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$9,706,970
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................8,564
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,913,317
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,628,851
Personal Service .............................................................................................11,669,970
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................1,256
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,279,528
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................20,950,754
Personal Service ....................................................................................................54,126
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 745,000
From Motor Vehicle Administration Technology Fund (1696) .....................................799,126
For a new motor vehicle and driver licensing computer system, including
design and procurement analysis, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 4.175
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................245,505
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,481,598
Expense and Equipment (including $746,400 one-time) ......................... 982,249
From Motor Vehicle Administration Technology Fund (1696) .......................... 2,463,847
Total (Not to exceed 483.59 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$37,088,083
Section 4.010. To the Department of Revenue
For the Division of Taxation, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.005,
4.010, 4.015, 4.020, and 4.025, and three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 4.175
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$26,145,307

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 3
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,955,651
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................28,100,958
Personal Service ....................................................................................................39,303
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,071
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .....................................................40,374
Personal Service ....................................................................................................48,902
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,818
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ..........................................................................51,720
Personal Service ....................................................................................................74,833
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,163
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................78,996
Personal Service ..................................................................................................836,485
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,277
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ...............................................................844,762
For organizational dues, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 4.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................212,401
For the integrated tax system, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 4.175
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,500,000
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................... 150,000
Total (Not to exceed 513.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$36,979,211
Section 4.015. To the Department of Revenue
For the Division of Motor Vehicle and Driver Licensing, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 4.005, 4.010, 4.015, 4.020, and 4.025, and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
4.175
Personal Service ................................................................................................$538,764
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 355,232
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................893,996

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 4
Personal Service ......................................................................................................3,574
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 253,776
From Department of Revenue - Federal Fund (1132) ....................................................257,350
Personal Service ..................................................................................................285,010
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 245,840
From Motor Vehicle Commission Fund (1588) .............................................................530,850
Personal Service ......................................................................................................8,911
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,953
From Department of Revenue Specialty Plate Fund (1775). ............................... 18,864
Total (Not to exceed 32.05 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,701,060
Section 4.020. To the Department of Revenue
For the Division of Legal Services, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.005,
4.010, 4.015, 4.020, and 4.025, and three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 4.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,588,690
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 192,426
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,781,116
Personal Service ..................................................................................................282,500
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 211,728
From Department of Revenue - Federal Fund (1132) ....................................................494,228
Personal Service ..................................................................................................610,648
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,140
From Motor Vehicle Commission Fund (1588) .............................................................638,788
Personal Service ....................................................................................................53,628
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,323
From Tobacco Control Special Fund (1984) ....................................................... 56,951
Total (Not to exceed 55.40 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,971,083
Section 4.025. To the Department of Revenue
For the Division of Administration, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 5
Sections 4.005, 4.010, 4.015, 4.020, and 4.025, and three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 4.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,256,280
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................1,599
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 371,227
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,629,106
Personal Service ....................................................................................................75,487
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,470,006
From Department of Revenue - Federal Fund (1132) .................................................3,545,493
Personal Service ....................................................................................................35,931
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,462,900
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ...........................................................1,498,831
For postage, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 4.175
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,320,418
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................5,373
From Motor Vehicle Commission Fund (1588) ...............................................................44,029
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .................................................... 1,343
Total (Not to exceed 49.51 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,044,593
Section 4.030. To the Department of Revenue
For distribution to any political subdivision(s) to offset tax credits
awarded by the state of Missouri for property taxes levied on
qualified rolling stock
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 4.035. To the Department of Revenue
For distribution to port authorities to expand, develop, and redevelop
advanced industrial manufacturing zones including the
satisfaction of bonds, managerial, engineering, legal, research,
promotion, and planning expenses
From Port Authority AIM Zone Fund (1583) ............................................................$2,091,155
For distribution to targeted industrial manufacturing enhancement zone
boards to expand, develop, and redevelop targeted industrial

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 6
manufacturing enhancement zones including the satisfaction of
bonds, managerial, engineering, legal, research, promotion, and
planning expenses
From TIME Zone Fund (1604) ............................................................................ 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,091,155
Section 4.040. To the Department of Revenue
For fees to counties as a result of delinquent collections made by circuit
attorneys or prosecuting attorneys and payment of collection
agency fees
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,900,000
Section 4.045. To the Department of Revenue
For fees to counties for the filing of lien notices and lien releases
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 4.050. To the Department of Revenue
For distribution to cities and counties of all funds accruing to the Motor
Fuel Tax Fund under the provisions of Sections 30(a) and 30(b),
Article IV, of the Constitution of Missouri
From Motor Fuel Tax Fund (1673) ........................................................................$536,000,000
Section 4.055. To the Department of Revenue
For distribution of emblem use fee contributions collected for specialty
plates
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$34,100
Section 4.060. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of any tax or any
payment credited to the General Revenue Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................$1,830,700,000
Section 4.065. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of any tax or any
payment credited to Federal and Other Funds
From Federal and Other Funds (Various) .......................................................................$50,000
Section 4.070. To the Department of Revenue

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 7
For refunds for any overpayment or erroneous payments of any tax or
fee credited to the State Highways and Transportation
Department Fund
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................$1,200,000
Section 4.075. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
credited to the Aviation Trust Fund
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ...................................................................................$50,000
Section 4.080. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds and distributions of motor fuel taxes
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$38,231,618
Section 4.085. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of any tax or any
payment credited to the Workers’ Compensation Fund
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ..............................................................$2,000,000
Section 4.090. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of any tax or any
payment for tobacco taxes
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ............................................................................$125,000
From State School Moneys Fund (1616) ..........................................................................25,000
From Fair Share Fund (1687) .............................................................................. 11,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$161,000
Section 4.095. To the Department of Revenue
For apportionments to the several counties and the City of St. Louis to
offset credits taken against the County Stock Insurance Tax
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$135,700
Section 4.100. To the Department of Revenue
For tax delinquencies set off by tax credits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 4.105. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Debt
Offset Escrow Fund in such amounts as may be necessary to

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 8
make payments of refunds set off against debts as required by
Section 143.786, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$37,213,307
Section 4.110. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Circuit
Courts Escrow Fund in such amounts as may be necessary to
make payments of refunds set off against debts as required by
Section 488.020(3), RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,074,458
Section 4.115. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds set off against debts as required by Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) .....................................................................$1,339,119
Section 4.120. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From School District Trust Fund (1688) ...................................................................$2,500,000
Section 4.125. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund in the amount of sixty-six hundredths
percent of the funds received
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..............................................................................$452,423
Section 4.130. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund in the amount of sixty-six hundredths
percent of the funds received
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...............................................................$452,423
Section 4.135. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for amounts
from income tax refunds designated by taxpayers for deposit in
various income tax check-off funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$471,000
Section 4.140. To the Department of Revenue

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 9
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for amounts from income tax refunds
erroneously deposited to various funds
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................$13,669
Section 4.145. To the Department of Revenue
For distribution from the various income tax check-off charitable trust
funds
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................$64,135
Section 4.150. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Highways and Transportation Department Fund
From Department of Revenue Information Fund (1619) ...........................................$1,250,000
Section 4.155. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Highways and Transportation Department Fund
From Motor Fuel Tax Fund (1673) .....................................................................$1,053,000,000
Section 4.160. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Highways and Transportation Department Fund
From Department of Revenue Specialty Plate Fund (1775) ...........................................$20,000
Section 4.165. To the Department of Revenue
For the State Tax Commission, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 4.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,863,721
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................13,658
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 172,961
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,050,340
For the Productive Capability of Agricultural and Horticultural Land Use
Study, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 4.175
Expense and Equipment

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 10
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 3,798
Total (Not to exceed 37.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,054,138
Section 4.170. To the Department of Revenue
For the state’s share of the costs and expenses incurred pursuant to an
approved assessment and equalization maintenance plan as
provided by Chapter 137, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$11,314,883
Section 4.175. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 4.180. To the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and all moneys received by the State Lottery Commission from
the sale of Missouri lottery tickets and from all other sources shall
be deposited in the State Lottery Fund, pursuant to Article III,
Section 39(b) of the Missouri Constitution
Personal Service, excluding any purposes for which
appropriations have been made elsewhere in this section .............................$9,655,383
Expense and Equipment, excluding any purposes for which
appropriations have been made elsewhere in this section ...............................6,964,636
For payments to vendors for costs of the design, manufacture, licensing,
leasing, processing, and delivery of games administered by the
State Lottery Commission, excluding any purposes for which
appropriations have been made elsewhere in this section .............................36,278,069
For payments to vendors for costs of the design, manufacture, licensing,
leasing, processing, and delivery of no more than 500 video pull
tab machines with a maximum of six machines per location
excluding any purposes for which appropriations have been made
elsewhere in this section ..................................................................................9,194,385
For advertising expenses ..............................................................................................5,400,000
For sponsorships or promotions .................................................................................................1
For responsible gaming messaging ..................................................................... 400,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 11
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) (Not to exceed 153.50 F.T.E.) .....................$67,892,474
Section 4.185. To the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
For the payment of prizes
From State Lottery Fund (1682) ............................................................................$200,277,993
Section 4.190. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Lottery
Enterprise Fund
From State Lottery Fund (1682) ..............................................................................$74,399,683
Section 4.195. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Lottery
Proceeds Fund
From State Lottery Fund (1682) ............................................................................$430,043,875
Section 4.400. To the Department of Transportation
For the Highways and Transportation Commission and Highway
Program Administration, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.400, 4.425, 4.495,
4.505, and 4.520
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$19,276,884
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,081,657
From State Road Fund (1320)....................................................................................24,358,541
Personal Service .............................................................................................11,175,787
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,970,779
From Federal Road Fund (1322)................................................................................14,146,566
For organizational dues
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)............................................................5,000
From State Road Fund (1320)...........................................................................................70,000
From Railroad Expense Fund (1659) ................................................................... 5,000
Total (Not to exceed 431.81 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$38,585,107
Section 4.405. To the Department of Transportation
For payment of the state's contribution to the Missouri Department of
Transportation and Highway Patrol Employees' Retirement

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 12
System, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 4.405, 4.410, 4.415 and 4.420
Personal Service
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)......................................................$459,612
From Department of Transportation - Highway Safety Fund (1149) .............................310,099
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................191,866,585
From Railroad Expense Fund (1659) ..............................................................................443,251
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .........................................................................114,306
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ........................................................................ 512,092
Total .......................................................................................................................$193,705,945
Section 4.410. To the Department of Transportation
For payment of the state's contribution for medical insurance, life
insurance and Employee Assistance Program benefits for active
Missouri Department of Transportation employees, provided
fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.405,
4.410, 4.415 and 4.420
Personal Service
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)......................................................$119,531
From Department of Transportation - Highway Safety Fund (1149) ...............................78,429
From Railroad Expense Fund (1659) ..............................................................................122,634
From State Transportation Fund (1675) ...........................................................................38,883
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ...................................................................................133,442
Personal Service .............................................................................................59,059,990
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 215,967
From State Road Fund (1320).............................................................................. 59,275,957
Total .........................................................................................................................$59,768,876
Section 4.415. To the Department of Transportation
For payment of the state's contribution for medical and life insurance
benefits for retired Missouri Department of Transportation
employees, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 4.405, 4.410, 4.415 and 4.420
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................$21,864,968
Section 4.420. To the Department of Transportation
For the provision of workers' compensation benefits to Missouri
Department of Transportation employees, provided fifty percent

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 13
(50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.405, 4.410, 4.415
and 4.420
From State Road Fund (1320)....................................................................................$9,447,141
Section 4.425. To the Department of Transportation
For the Construction Program
To pay the cost of reimbursing counties and other political
subdivisions for the acquisition of roads and bridges taken over
by the state as permanent parts of the state highway system and
for the costs of locating, relocating, establishing, acquiring,
constructing, reconstructing, widening, and improving those
highways, bridges, tunnels, parkways, travelways, tourways, and
coordinated facilities authorized under Article IV, Section30(b)
of the Constitution of Missouri and for acquiring materials,
equipment, and buildings necessary for such purposes and for
other purposes and contingencies relating to the location and
construction of highways and bridges; and to expend funds from
the United States Government for like purposes, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.400,
4.425, 4.495, 4.505, and 4.520
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$78,965,160
Expense and Equipment .................................................................................30,755,382
Construction ............................................................................................. 1,674,435,020
From State Road Fund (1320)...............................................................................1,784,155,562
Personal Service .............................................................................................41,446,942
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 994,726,598
From Federal Road Fund (1322)...........................................................................1,036,173,540
For all expenditures associated with paying outstanding state road bond
debt, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
the State Road Fund and State Road Bond Fund
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................108,740,136
From State Road Bond Fund (1319) .................................................................... 201,259,881
Total (Not to exceed 1,646.87 F.T.E.) ................................................................$3,130,329,119
Section 4.430. To the Department of Transportation
There is transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable to the
General Revenue Fund, such amount as may be necessary to pay

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 14
the debt service for state road bonds issued in one or more series
by the state Highways and Transportation Commission with a
term for each series not to exceed fifteen years and annual debt
service for all series payable in any year not to exceed
$136,000,000, pursuant to a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration, to fund not to
exceed $1,400,000,000 of the costs to plan, design, construct,
reconstruct, rehabilitate and repair three lanes in each direction
on I-70, to be deposited into the State Road Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$136,000,000
Section 4.435. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with paying debt service of outstanding
state road bonds issued by the state Highways and Transportation
Commission pursuant to a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration related to the
planning, designing, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating
and repairing three lanes in each direction on I-70
From State Road Fund (1320)................................................................................$136,000,000
Section 4.450. To the Department of Transportation
There is transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable to the
General Revenue Fund, such amount as may be necessary to pay
the debt service for state road bonds issued in one or more series
by the state Highways and Transportation Commission with a
term for each series not to exceed 10 years and annual debt
service for all series payable in any year not to exceed
$44,000,000, pursuant to a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration, to fund not to
exceed $363,750,000 of the costs to plan, design, construct,
reconstruct, rehabilitate and repair on I-44 from Missouri Route
T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route 160 to Missouri Route
125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route 249 and rebuild pavement
and improve the I-44/Route 13 interchange and the I-44/I-49
interchange and other I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects listed on the
Unfunded Needs List, to be deposited into the State Road Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$44,000,000
Section 4.455. To the Department of Transportation

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 15
For all expenditures associated with paying debt service of outstanding
state road bonds issued by the state Highways and Transportation
Commission pursuant to a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration related to the
planning, designing, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating
and repairing on I-44 from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route
68, from US Route 160 to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to
Missouri Route 249 and rebuild pavement and improve the I-
44/Route 13 interchange and the I-44/I-49 interchange and other
I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects listed on the Unfunded Needs List
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................$44,000,000
Section 4.470. To the Department of Transportation
There is transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable to the
General Revenue Fund, such amount as may be necessary to pay
the debt service for state road bonds issued by the state Highways
and Transportation Commission with a term not to exceed seven
years and annual debt service not to exceed $45,550,000, payable
in accordance with a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration, with the state road
bonds issued with respect to said financing agreement not to
exceed $301,000,000 of costs to plan, design, construct,
reconstruct, rehabilitate, and make significant repairs to bridges
on the state highway system under the Commission's five-year
Statewide Transportation Improvement Program, to be deposited
into the State Road Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$45,550,000
Section 4.475. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with paying debt service of outstanding
state road bonds issued by the state Highways and Transportation
Commission pursuant to a financing agreement between the
Commission and the Office of Administration related to the
planning, designing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
and significant repair of 215 bridges on the state highway system
under the Commission's five-year Statewide Transportation
Improvement Program
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................$45,550,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 16
Section 4.480. To the Department of Transportation
For a transportation cost-share program with local communities,
provided that these funds shall not supplant, and shall only
supplement, the current planned allocation of road and bridge
expenditures under the most recently adopted state transportation
and improvement plan, including all amendments thereto, as of
the date of passage of this bill by the General Assembly, and
provided that the Department of Transportation and the
Department of Economic Development work cooperatively to
select projects with the greatest economic benefit to the State
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,767,009
Section 4.485. To the Department of Transportation
For extra turn lanes at schools in a village with more than one hundred
eighty-five but fewer than two hundred ten inhabitants and
located in a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
one thousand but fewer than four thousand inhabitants, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$350,000
For the maintenance and improvements of a footbridge that is
approximately five hundred sixty-two feet long located in any
city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that no local
matching funds shall be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 8,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,350,000
Section 4.490. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing, construction and improvements of U.S.
Highway 63 in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of a roundabout near an
international airport in city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 17
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,500,000
For the planning, design, right of way acquisition, upgrades, and
construction to Mexico City Avenue in any county with more
than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................17,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of a turn lane adjacent to a
high school in a city with more than one thousand five hundred
but fewer than one thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
located in a county with more than six thousand but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
four hundred but fewer than one thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For repair, maintenance, and expansion of Route N in a county with more
than one hundred twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,197,200
For the planning, design, and construction of a climbing lane on
westbound I-44 at the intersection of I-44 and Highway 43
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................11,915,143
For distribution to a city with more than eleven thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one million inhabitants, for the planning, design,
and construction of a four lane bridge with a multipurpose trail,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,000,000
For road improvements in a county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than two hundred inhabitants, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
basis

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 18
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,366,000
For the planning, design, and construction of on and off ramps as well as
outer road additions and upgrades at the intersection of Ingram
Road and U.S. Highway 60
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................5,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of safety and mobility
improvements at the intersections of U.S. Highway 54 with:
Route 5, Laker Pride Road, and Jack Crowell Road
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of road improvements to
Business Route 63 between East Burkhart Street and Route M, to
include the intersection at Route M
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,100,000
For distribution to a city with more than one thousand seven hundred but
fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in
a county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants, for the
planning, design, and construction of a road spur
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................250,000
For distribution to a metropolitan planning organization serving a county
with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, for
an environmental assessment for a bridge
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..............................................................25,000
For the planning, design, and construction of safety improvements at the
intersection of Route 185 and Strange Drive in Washington
County
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................900,000
For distribution to a city with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand four hundred inhabitants and partially located in a

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 19
county with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than
eight hundred thousand inhabitants, for repair to a road providing
access to a city-owned landfill that, if not repaired, would impede
access to first responders in the event of an emergency
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................700,000
For the planning, design, and construction of a diverging diamond at the
intersection of I-470 and View High Drive in Lee's Summit
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For the planning, design, and construction of infrastructure
improvements on Highway 76 in a city with more than twelve
thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty thousand
but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than one thousand but fewer than four thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,000,000
For maintenance, repair and upgrades to Shafer Road in Texas and
Phelps counties
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$62,953,343
Section 4.495. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For preserving and maintaining the state system of roads and bridges and
coordinated facilities authorized under Article IV, Section 30(b)
of the Constitution of Missouri and for acquiring materials,
equipment, and buildings necessary for such purposes and for
other purposes and contingencies related to the preservation,
maintenance, and safety of highways and bridges, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.400, 4.425, 4.495,
4.505, and 4.520
Personal Service ................................................................................................$582,087
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 62,587
From Department of Transportation – Highway Safety Fund (1149) ............................644,674

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 20
Personal Service .............................................................................................86,978,636
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 148,098,758
From Federal Road Fund (1322)..............................................................................235,077,394
Personal Service ...........................................................................................150,363,932
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 254,408,651
From State Road Fund (1320)..................................................................................404,772,583
Expense and Equipment
From Motorcycle Safety Trust Fund (1246) ...................................................................250,000
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................20,000,000
For allotments, grants, and contributions from grants of National
Highway Safety Act moneys for vehicle checkpoints where
motorists may be detained without individualized reasonable
suspicion, and related administrative expenses
From Department of Transportation – Highway Safety Fund (1149) .......................................1
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from grants of National
Highway Safety Act moneys for highway safety education and
enforcement programs and their related administrative expenses,
excluding expenses related to vehicle checkpoints where
motorists may be detained without individualized reasonable
suspicion
From Department of Transportation – Highway Safety Fund (1149) .......................25,000,582
For the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program
From Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program/Division of
Transportation – Federal Fund (1185) ..................................................... 6,150,691
Total (Not to exceed 4,266.12 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$691,895,925
Section 4.500. To the Department of Transportation
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund
From Missouri Medal of Honor Recipients Fund (1401) .............................................$250,000
Section 4.505. To the Department of Transportation
For Fleet, Facilities, and Information Systems

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 21
For constructing, preserving, and maintaining the state system of roads
and bridges and coordinated facilities authorized under Article
IV, Section 30(b) of the Constitution of Missouri and for
acquiring materials, equipment, and buildings necessary for such
purposes and for other purposes and contingencies related to the
construction, preservation, and maintenance of highways and
bridges, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 4.400, 4.425, 4.495, 4.505, and 4.520
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$15,356,288
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 117,456,691
From State Road Fund (1320) (Not to exceed 272.25 F.T.E.) ...............................$132,812,979
Section 4.510. To the Department of Transportation
For refunding any tax or fee credited to the State Highways and
Transportation Department Fund ...................................................................$1,000,000
For refunds and distributions of motor fuel taxes ................................................ 40,000,000
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$41,000,000
Section 4.515. To the Department of Transportation
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .....................$813,945,000
Section 4.520. To the Department of Transportation
For Multimodal Operations Administration, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 4.400, 4.425, 4.495, 4.505, and 4.520
Personal Service ................................................................................................$806,762
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 270,433
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126).....................................................1,077,195
Personal Service ..................................................................................................692,673
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 42,200
From State Road Fund (1320).........................................................................................734,873
Personal Service ..................................................................................................768,493

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 22
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 160,024
From Railroad Expense Fund (1659) ..............................................................................928,517
Personal Service ..................................................................................................216,384
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 467,055
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .........................................................................683,439
Personal Service ..................................................................................................873,503
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 26,736
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ........................................................................ 900,239
Total (Not to exceed 45.68 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,324,263
Section 4.525. To the Department of Transportation
For Multimodal Operations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund for providing professional and technical services and
administrative support of the multimodal program
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)......................................................$167,000
From Railroad Expense Fund (1659) ..............................................................................635,690
From State Transportation Fund (1675) ...........................................................................70,000
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ........................................................................ 205,444
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,078,134
Section 4.530. To the Department of Transportation
For Multimodal Operations
For loans from the State Transportation Assistance Revolving Fund to
political subdivisions of the state or to public or private not-for-
profit organizations or entities in accordance with Section
226.191, RSMo
From State Transportation Assistance Revolving Fund (1841) .................................$1,000,000
Section 4.535. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For distributing funds to urban, small urban, and rural transportation
systems, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 4.635
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $5,000,000 one-time) ..................$10,000,000
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .............................................................. 1,710,875
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,710,875

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 23
Section 4.536. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For distribution to a public transit provider serving a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county for a program to accommodate the need for expanded
public transit services related to hosting the 2026 World Cup
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ......................................................$1,000,000
Section 4.540. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For locally matched grants under Sections 5310, Title 49, United States
Code to assist private, non profit organizations in improving
public transportation for the state's elderly and people with
disabilities and to assist disabled persons with transportation
services beyond those required by the Americans with
Disabilities Act, provided twenty five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 4.540, 4.545, 4.550, 4.555, and 4.560
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126).................................................$14,300,000
Section 4.545. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For locally matched grants under Sections 5311 and 5312, Title 49,
United States Code, provided twenty five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 4.540, 4.545, 4.550,
4.555, and 4.560
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126).................................................$40,000,000
For grants under Sections 5310, 5311, 5312, and 5340, Title 49, United
States Code
From Department of Transportation Federal Stimulus Fund (2320) ...........................3,000,000
For assistance to transit providers to continue responding to the ongoing
COVID-19 pandemic, including for costs to assist with
operations, including payroll and personal protective equipment
expenses, including support to rural transit agencies and transit
service for the elderly and individuals with disabilities, pursuant
to the provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
From Department of Transportation Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund
(2443) ....................................................................................................... 1,200,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 24
Total .........................................................................................................................$44,200,000
Section 4.550. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For grants under Section 5309, Title 49, United States Code to assist
private, non profit organizations providing public transportation
services, provided twenty five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 4.540, 4.545, 4.550, 4.555, and 4.560
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$1,000,000
Section 4.555. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For grants to metropolitan areas under Section 5303, Title 49, United
States Code, provided twenty five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 4.540, 4.545, 4.550, 4.555, and 4.560
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$1,500,000
Section 4.560. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For grants to public transit providers to replace, rehabilitate, and
purchase vehicles and related equipment and to construct vehicle
related facilities, provided twenty five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between Sections 4.540, 4.545, 4.550, 4.555, and
4.560
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126) (including $500,000
(one-time) .....................................................................................................$13,900,000
Section 4.565. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For an operating subsidy for not-for-profit transporters of the elderly,
people with disabilities, and low-income individuals, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 4.635
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,725,522
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .............................................................. 1,274,478
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 4.570. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 25
For a non-profit organization founded in 1982 - and located in a county
with more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants – that
serves seniors ages 60 and over for the development and
implementation of an integrated transit planning system and
services for seniors, veterans, and the disabled in a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants, a
county with more than two hundred thirty thousand but fewer
than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, and a city with more
than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand that serves as
the county seat in a county with more than seventy thousand and
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, based on the
recommendations of Missouri Statewide Transit Assessment that
can serve as a foundational model for a statewide planning
system that analyzes and optimizes service delivery
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$6,000,000
Section 4.575. To the Department of Transportation
For the Light Rail Safety Program
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)......................................................$505,962
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .............................................................. 126,491
Total ..............................................................................................................................$632,453
Section 4.580. To the Department of Transportation
For the Rail Program
For daily passenger rail service in Missouri, provided the department
operate the service without incurring any further arrears or
otherwise commit itself or the state to any form of debt payments
to operate the service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,721,782 one-time) ..................$19,221,782
Section 4.585. To the Department of Transportation
For station repairs and improvements at Missouri Amtrak stations
From State Transportation Fund (1675) .........................................................................$35,000
Section 4.590. To the Department of Transportation

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 26
For protection of the public against hazards existing at railroad crossings
pursuant to Chapter 389, RSMo
From Grade Crossing Safety Account (1290) ...........................................................$3,000,000
For distribution to a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than
fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants for the planning, design, and construction of gates and
signals at a railroad crossing with a road
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,500,000
Section 4.600. To the Department of Transportation
For the Aviation Program
For construction, capital improvements, and maintenance of publicly
owned airfields, including land acquisition, and for printing
charts and directories
From Aviation Trust Fund (1952) ............................................................................$10,000,000
For an advanced weather system for an airport in a county with more
than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand
but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants and
owned by a city with more than nine thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................600,000
For distribution to a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
one thousand but fewer than four thousand inhabitants for road
improvements providing access to an airport
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000
For demolition, renovations, improvements, and construction at an
airport located in a county with more than one million inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................7,000,000
For planning, designing, and construction of an education building at an
airport located in any county with more than seventeen thousand

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 27
six hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than
ten thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,700,000
For planning, designing, renovations, improvements, and construction at
an airport located in any city with more than eighteen thousand
but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and that is the county
seat of a county with more than sixty thousand but fewer than
seventy thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$25,300,000
Section 4.605. To the Department of Transportation
For the Aviation Program
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of publicly owned
airfields by cities or other political subdivisions, including land
acquisition, pursuant to the provisions of the State Block Grant
Program administered through the Federal Airport Improvement
Program and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126).................................................$83,450,000
For construction, capital improvements, operations, or planning of
publicly owned airfields by cities or other political subdivisions,
including land acquisition, pursuant to the provisions of the
Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act
From Department of Transportation Federal Stimulus Fund (2320) ..............................300,000
For assistance to airport sponsors to prevent, prepare for, and respond to
COVID-19, including for costs related to operations, personnel,
cleaning, sanitization, janitorial services, combating the spread of
pathogens at the airport, and debt service payments, pursuant to
the provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
From Department of Transportation Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund
(2443) ....................................................................................................... 950,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$84,700,000
Section 4.610. To the Department of Transportation

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 28
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Waterways and Ports Trust Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $3,000,000 one-time) ..................$14,620,577
Section 4.615. To the Department of Transportation
For the Waterways Program
For grants to port authorities for assistance in port planning, acquisition,
or construction within the port districts, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 4.635
From State Transportation Fund (1675) ....................................................................$1,000,000
For capital improvement matching grants contributing eighty percent of
the funds and local port authorities contributing twenty percent
of the funds for specific undertakings of port development such
as land acquisitions, construction, terminal facility development,
port improvement projects, and other related port facilities,
pursuant to subsection 2 of Section 68.035, RSMo, and
subsection 4 of Section 68.080, RSMo
From Waterways and Ports Trust Fund (1237) .................................................... 20,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$21,000,000
Section 4.621. To the Department of Transportation
For the Waterways Program
For grants to a port authority located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand but fewer than three thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,500,000
For grants to a port authority located in a county with more than twenty-
five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than two thousand five hundred but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,000,000
For ferryboat operations and/or capital improvements at a port in a
county with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants

CCS SCS HCS HB 4 29
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................... 200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,700,000
Section 4.625. To the Department of Transportation
For the Federal Rail, Port and Freight Assistance Program
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126).................................................$26,000,000
Section 4.630. To the Department of Transportation
For the Freight Enhancement Program
For projects to improve connectors for ports, rail, and other non-highway
transportation systems
From State Transportation Fund (1675) ....................................................................$3,250,000
Section 4.635. To the Department of Transportation
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Department of Revenue Totals
General Revenue Fund (841.02 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$78,222,173
Federal Funds (4.74 F.T.E.) .........................................................................................4,297,071
Other Funds (478.29 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 835,436,230
Total (1,324.05 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$917,955,474
Department of Transportation Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$403,688,234
Federal Funds (2,303.99 F.T.E.) ...........................................................................1,505,349,276
Other Funds (4,358.74 F.T.E.) ............................................................................ 2,964,887,853
Total (6,662.73 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$4,873,925,363
